California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 29.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

27407.

No judgment or court order issued pursuant to this chapter is binding on the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program until the plan has been joined as a party to the action and has been served with a certified copy of the judgment or court order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 311.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27408.

(a) Sections 26107, 26700, 26802, 26806, 27000, 27002, paragraphs (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 26807, and paragraphs (1) and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 26807.5 shall apply to a nonparticipant spouse as if she or he were a participant.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section shall not be construed to establish any right for the nonparticipant spouse that is not explicitly established in Sections 27400 to 27405, inclusive, and Sections 27409 to 27412, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

27409.

Upon being awarded separate nominal accounts or an interest in the annuity of a participant, a nonparticipant spouse shall provide the system with proof of his or her date of birth, social security number, and any other information requested by the system, in the form and manner requested by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27410.

(a) The nonparticipant spouse who is awarded separate nominal accounts shall have the right to designate, pursuant to Sections 27100 to 27102, inclusive, a beneficiary or beneficiaries to receive the amounts credited to the separate nominal accounts of the nonparticipant spouse on his or her date of death, and any annuity attributable to the separate nominal accounts which is unpaid on the date of the death of the nonparticipant spouse.

(b) This section shall not be construed to provide the nonparticipant spouse with any right to elect a joint and survivor annuity pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 26807 or subdivision (a) of Section 26807.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

27411.

The nonparticipant spouse who is awarded a separate nominal account under this part shall have the right to an annuity pursuant to paragraph (1) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 26807.5.

(a) The nonparticipant spouse shall be eligible for an annuity if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The nonparticipant spouse has at least three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) in his or her separate nominal accounts.

(2) The nonparticipant spouse has attained the age of 55 years or more.

(b) An annuity of a nonparticipant spouse shall become effective upon any date designated by the nonparticipant spouse, provided:

(1) The requirements of subdivision (a) are satisfied.

(2) The nonparticipant spouse has filed an application for an annuity on a properly executed form provided by the system, which is executed no earlier than 90 days before the effective date of the annuity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

27412.

The system shall include the contribution and earnings credits awarded to a nonparticipant spouse in the judgment or court order to determine the eligibility of a participant for an annuity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 608, Sec. 55.   Effective September 19, 1996.   Applicable from July 1, 1996, pursuant to Sec. 58 of Ch. 608.)
-------------------------------------------

27413.

It is the intent of the Legislature to abolish any application of the terminable interest doctrine in California relating to the division of public retirement benefits of a participant in the event of dissolution of marriage or death if the division is made under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Military Services [28000. - 28006.]

28000.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares its intent to preserve and protect the rights of reemployed participants who have been absent from a position of employment covered by the Cash Balance Benefit Program to serve in the uniformed services of the United States in accordance with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994 (Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code).

(b) The plan shall comply with Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code, as that chapter may be amended from time to time.

(c) The term “service
 in the uniformed services,” for purposes of determining plan vesting, eligibility for membership, and accrual of benefits, means the performance of duty on a voluntary or involuntary basis in a uniformed service under competent authority and includes active duty, active duty for training, initial active duty for training, inactive duty training, a period for which a participant is absent from a position of employment for the purpose of an examination to determine the fitness of the participant to perform any such duty, and the period of time following the actual service in the uniformed service through the last day a member is eligible to report back to work or to apply for reemployment as specified under Section 1002.259 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) The term “uniformed services” means the Armed Forces of the United States of America, the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard when engaged in active duty for
 training, inactive duty training, or full-time National Guard duty, the commissioned corps of the United States Public Health Service, and any other category of persons designated by the President in time of war or emergency.

(e) No entitlement of the right to contribute toward credits under the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to this chapter by the participant as a result of service in the uniformed services shall accrue if the participant does not return to employment with the same employer or employers which employed the participant immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services as prescribed in Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 46.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

28001.

(a) The participant who returns to employment with the same employer which had employed the participant immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code, shall be treated as not having incurred a break in the performance of creditable service by reason of that participant’s period or periods of service in the uniformed services. The length of each period of service in the uniformed services shall not exceed five years unless otherwise permitted pursuant to Section 28004. Each period of service in the uniformed services by the participant shall, upon that participant’s return to employment with the
 same employer or employers which had employed the participant immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services, constitute employment toward the performance of creditable service provided that participant elects to remit the employee contributions that would have been made during the period of service in the uniformed services. The remittance of employee contributions shall be calculated pursuant to Sections 26501 and 28003. In no event shall that remittance exceed the amount the participant would have been required to contribute during that period of performance of creditable service had the participant remained continuously employed by the last employer and not served in the uniformed services throughout that period.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 26506, remittance of employee contributions in accordance with subdivision (a) shall be made by the employer pursuant to Section 26502 upon the employer’s receipt of
 written consent of the participant specifying a schedule of repayments. That remittance shall commence during the period beginning with the date of return to employment and may continue for three times the period of the participant’s eligible period of service in the uniformed services, not to exceed five years. The plan’s receipt of the remittance payments to the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program shall be credited pursuant to Chapter 7 of this part. Contributions, interest, and additional earnings credits the participant would have earned had the participant remained continuously employed during the period of eligible service in the uniformed services shall be credited to employee and employer accounts retroactively upon receipt of the employee contributions. Upon receipt of the remittance payments to the plan, the payments shall be subject to the same terms and conditions under the program as if the payments had been employee contributions made by the participant had the participant not
 served for a period in the uniformed services. In no event shall the current year contributions and contributions made for purposes of purchasing service exceed the maximum exclusion allowance as set forth in the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 47.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

28002.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an employer reemploying a participant with service subject to the requirements of Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code, shall be liable to remit the employer contributions provided that employer employed the participant immediately prior to the eligible period of service in the uniformed services. The contribution rate by the employer shall be to the same extent as that for contributions to the Cash Balance Benefit Program for other employees during the same period. In addition to contributions due pursuant to this subdivision, the employer shall remit an amount that is the equivalent of the full cost of any interest and additional earnings credits credited
 pursuant to Section 28001. The employer shall provide information regarding the reemployment of a participant who is subject to Chapter 43 (commencing with Section 4301) of Title 38 of the United States Code on a form prescribed by the system within 30 days of the date of reemployment. Following receipt of that notice, the system shall calculate in accordance with Section 28003 the total amount of employer contributions due for the participant for the full period of service in the uniformed services. Within 60 working days of notification by the plan of amount due, the employer shall remit to the plan all employer contributions.

(b) The employer shall not be liable for employer contributions for the period of service in the uniformed services if the participant elects not to remit the employee contributions for that period through the employer as required under Section 28001. In the event the participant does not remit all of the employee
 contributions within the prescribed repayment period, the total amount of the employer contributions that were remitted for that period shall be adjusted pursuant to Section 26302.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 48.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

28003.

For purposes of calculating the employer’s liability under Section 28002 or the required employee contributions under Section 28001, the participant’s salary during that period shall be computed as follows:

(a) The salary the participant would have received with the employer for the eligible period of service in the uniformed services.

(b) In the event that salary is not reasonably certain, the contributions shall be based on the participant’s average salary with the employer during the 12-month period immediately preceding the eligible period of service in the uniformed services or, if shorter, the contributions shall be based on the participant’s average salary for the period of employment immediately preceding that period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 680, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

28004.

A participant who is absent from a position of employment subject to the Cash Balance Benefit Program due to that participant’s service in the uniformed services, shall not be entitled to obtain the right to contribute toward credits under the plan in excess of five years of service in the uniformed services, except for the following reasons:

(a) The participant is required to serve beyond five years to complete an initial period of obligated service in the uniformed services;

(b) The participant was unable to obtain orders releasing the participant from a period of service in the uniformed services before the expiration of the five-year period and that inability was through no fault of the participant;

(c) The participant served in the uniformed services as required pursuant to Section 270 of Title 10, under Section 502(a) or 503 of Title 32 of the United States Code, or to fulfill additional training requirements determined and certified in writing by the Secretary of Defense, to be necessary for professional development, or for completion of skill training or retraining; or

(d) The participant is:

(1) Ordered to or retained on active duty under Section 672(a), 672(g), 673, 673b, 673c, or 688 of Title 10 or under Section 331, 332, 359, 360, 367, or 712 of Title 14 of the United States Code.

(2) Ordered to or retained on active duty, other than for training, under any provision of law during a war or during a national emergency declared by the President or the Congress.

(3) Ordered to active duty, other than for training, in support, as determined by the secretary concerned, of an operational mission for which personnel have been ordered to active duty under Section 673b of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(4) Ordered to active duty in support, as determined by the secretary concerned, of a critical mission or requirement of the uniformed services.

(5) Called into federal service as a participant of the National Guard under Chapter 15 of Title 10 or under Section 3500 or 8500 of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 317.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

28005.

A participant’s entitlement to the right to contribute toward credits under the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to this chapter by reason of the service in the uniformed services terminates upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

(a) A separation of the participant from the uniformed service with a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge.

(b) A separation of the participant from the uniformed service under other than honorable conditions, as characterized pursuant to regulations prescribed by the secretary concerned.

(c) A dismissal of the participant permitted under Section 1161(a) of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(d) A dropping of the participant from the rolls pursuant to Section 1161(b) of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 318.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

28006.

No provision of this chapter shall apply to the extent it would require any action to be taken that would cause the plan or its members to incur adverse tax consequences under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Title 26 of the United States Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 680, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Discontinuation of Plan [28100. - 28101.]

28100.

(a) The employer may discontinue providing the Cash Balance Benefit Program at anytime in accordance with the terms and conditions of the employer’s governing board’s formal action to provide the program.

(b) The employer shall notify the system of the decision to discontinue the plan no less than 90 calendar days prior to the effective date of discontinuance. Such notice shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

28101.

(a) Upon discontinuation of the Cash Balance Benefit Program by the employer, the system will hold the employee and employer accounts for the benefit of the participant. The participant is immediately vested in both employee and employer accounts including accrued interest.

(b) Both employee and employer accounts will continue to be credited with interest at the minimum interest rate so long as there is an undistributed balance in such accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 19. MISCELLANEOUS [32001. - 32454.]



  CHAPTER 1. School Safety—Public and Private Institutions [32001. - 32100.]



  ARTICLE 1. Uniform Fire Signals [32001. - 32001.]

32001.

Every public, private, or parochial school building having an occupant capacity of 50 or more pupils or students or more than one classroom shall be provided with a dependable and operative fire alarm system. Every person and public officer managing, controlling, or in charge of any public, private, or parochial school shall cause the fire alarm signal to be sounded upon the discovery of fire, unless the school is equipped with an automatic fire detection, and alarm system, which may include, but for the purposes of this section is not required to include, a sprinkler system, as described in Section 17074.52. Every person and public officer managing, controlling, or in charge of any public, private, or parochial school, other than a two-year community college, shall cause the fire alarm signal to be sounded not less than once every calendar month and shall conduct a fire drill at least once every calendar month at the elementary level and at least four times every school year at the intermediate levels.

A fire drill shall be held at the secondary level not less than twice every school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 725, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Gates to School Grounds [32020. - 32020.]

32020.

The governing board of every school district, and the governing authority of every private school, which maintains any building used for the instruction or housing of school pupils on land entirely enclosed (except for building walls) by fences or walls, shall, through cooperation with the local law enforcement and fire protection agencies having jurisdiction of the area, make provision for the erection of gates in such fences or walls. The gates shall be of sufficient size to permit the entrance of the ambulances, police equipment, and firefighting apparatus, used by the law enforcement and fire protection agencies. There shall be no less than one such access gate and there shall be as many such gates as needed to assure access to all major building and grounds areas. If such gates are to be equipped with locks, the locking devices shall be designed to permit ready entrance by the use of the chain or bolt cutting devices with which the local law enforcement and fire protection agencies may be equipped.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. School Eye Safety [32030. - 32034.]

32030.

It shall be the duty of the governing board of every school district, and of every county superintendent of schools, and of every person, firm, or organization maintaining any private school, in this state, to equip schools with eye protective devices as defined in Section 32032, for the use of all students, teachers, and visitors when participating in the courses which are included in Section 32031. It shall be the duty of the superintendents, principals, teachers or instructors charged with the supervision of any class in which any such course is conducted, to require such eye protective devices to be worn by students, teachers, or instructors and visitors under the circumstances prescribed in Section 32031.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

32031.

The eye protective devices shall be worn in courses including, but not limited to, vocational or industrial arts shops or laboratories, and chemistry, physics or combined chemistry-physics laboratories, at any time at which the individual is engaged in, or observing, an activity or the use of hazardous substances likely to cause injury to the eyes.

Hazardous substances likely to cause physical injury to the eyes include materials which are flammable, toxic, corrosive to living tissues, irritating, strongly sensitizing, radioactive, or which generate pressure through heat, decomposition or other means as defined in the California Hazardous Substances Labeling Act.

Activity or the use of hazardous substances likely to cause injury to the eyes includes, but is not necessarily limited to, the following:

1. Working with hot molten metal.

2. Milling, sawing, turning, shaping, cutting, grinding and stamping of any solid materials.

3. Heat treating, tempering, or kiln firing of any metal or other materials. 

4. Gas or electric arc welding.

5. Repairing or servicing of any vehicles, or other machinery or equipment.

6. Working with hot liquids or solids or with chemicals which are flammable, toxic, corrosive to living tissues, irritating, strongly sensitizing, radioactive, or which generate pressure through heat, decomposition, or other means.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

32032.

For purposes of this article the eye protective devices utilized shall be industrial quality eye protective devices which meet the standards of the American National Standards Institute for “Practice for Occupational and Educational Eye and Face Protection” (Z87.1-1968), and subsequent standards that are adopted by the American National Standards Institute for “Practice for Occupational and Educational Eye and Face Protection.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

32033.

The eye protective devices may be sold to the pupils and teachers or instructors at a price that shall not exceed the actual cost of the eye protective devices to the school or governing board.

This section shall become operative January 1, 1992.

(History: Amended (as enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010) by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1118, Sec. 2.   Section operative January 1, 1992, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

32034.

The term eye protective devices as used in Sections 32030 to 32033, inclusive, shall not include prescription lenses as defined in Chapter 5.4 (commencing with Section 2540), Division 2, Business and Professions Code. Prescription lenses which meet the standards set forth in Section 32032 may be used by persons doing the work described in Item 6 of Section 32031 in a classroom under the supervision of appropriate personnel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. First Aid Equipment [32040. - 32044.]

32040.

The governing board of any school district, superintendent of schools, or principal in whom is vested the administration or supervision of any public or private school in the state shall equip the school with a first aid kit, whenever any pupils of the school are conducted or taken on field trips under the supervision or direction of any teacher in, or employee or agent of, the school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

32041.

The teacher, instructor agent, or employee shall have the first aid kit in his possession, or immediately available, while conducting the field trip.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

32043.

(a) Whenever a field trip is conducted into an area which is commonly known to be infested by poisonous snakes, the first aid kit may include a snakebite kit.

(b) Any first aid kit or snakebite kit taken into an area which is commonly known to be infested by poisonous snakes shall contain medically accepted snakebite remedies.

(c) Any field trip into an area which is commonly known to be infested by poisonous snakes that is conducted by any public or private school in the state shall be accompanied by a teacher, employee, or agent of the school who has completed a course in first aid, certified by the American Red Cross, which emphasizes the treatment of snakebites. It shall be the responsibility of the school conducting the field trip to comply with the requirements of this section and nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the American Red Cross to provide first aid courses in any manner or location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32044.

Any member of the governing board of any school district, and any superintendent of schools, principal, teacher, instructor, or agent who willfully violates the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 470, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Hazing Laws [32051. - 32051.]

32051.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Hazing” means a method of initiation or preinitiation into a student organization or student body that is likely to cause serious bodily injury to a former, current, or prospective pupil of a school. “Hazing” does not include customary athletic events or school-sanctioned events.

(2) “School” means a public or private school in the state maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive. 

(b) On or before July 1, 2025, the department shall make available on the
 department’s internet website both of the following:

(1) A model antihazing policy for local educational agencies.

(2) Resources on hazing prevention for professional development purposes and for increasing awareness among pupils, school staff, and community members of the dangers of hazing.

(c) Schools are encouraged to use the resources made available by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) for professional development purposes and for increasing awareness among pupils, school staff, and community members of the dangers of hazing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 704, Sec. 1.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Toxic Art Supplies in Schools [32060. - 32066.]

32060.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that art supplies which contain toxic substances or which are potential human carcinogens pose a significant danger to the health and safety of school children. The Legislature also finds and declares that school children are not sufficiently protected by present health laws in so far as materials which may be seriously harmful are not so labeled and therefore children are not properly warned as to the dangers inherent in the use of those materials.

(b) The Legislature intends by this article to ensure that elementary school children are protected by prohibiting the sale of these toxic substances to schools, school districts, and private schools for use in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and that the toxic substances may be purchased by schools, school districts, and private schools for students in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, only if the materials are properly labeled, as described in Section 32064.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 252, Sec. 1.   Operative June 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 252.)
-------------------------------------------

32061.

“Art or craft material” means any raw or processed material or manufactured product marketed or being represented by the manufacturer or repackager as being suitable for use in the demonstration or the creation of any work of visual or graphic art of any medium. These media may include, but shall not be limited to, paintings, drawings, prints, sculpture, ceramics, enamels, jewelry, stained glass, plastic sculpture, photographs, and leather and textile goods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 252, Sec. 1.   Operative June 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 252.)
-------------------------------------------

32062.

(a) “Human carcinogen” means any substance listed as a human carcinogen by the International Agency for Research on Cancer.

(b) “Potential human carcinogen” means one of the following:

(1) Any substance which does not meet the definition of human carcinogen, but for which there exists sufficient evidence of carcinogenicity in animals, as determined by the International Agency for Research on Cancer.

(2) Any chemical shown to be changed by the human body into a human carcinogen.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 252, Sec. 1.   Operative June 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 252.)
-------------------------------------------

32063.

“Toxic substance causing chronic illness” means any of the following:

(a) Human carcinogens.

(b) Potential human carcinogens.

(c) Any substance included in the list of hazardous substances prepared by the Director of Industrial Relations, pursuant to Section 6382 of the Labor Code, notwithstanding exemptions made for substances on the list which are used in particular forms, circumstances, or concentrations, if the health hazard presented by the substance is not the subject of label statements required by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 252, Sec. 1.   Operative June 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 252.)
-------------------------------------------

32064.

(a) For the 1987–88 academic year and for each academic year thereafter, no art or craft material that is deemed by the State Department of Health Services to contain a toxic substance, as defined by the California Hazardous Substance Act, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 108100) of Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, or a toxic substance causing chronic illness, as defined in this article, shall be ordered or purchased by any school, school district, or governing authority of a private school in California for use by students in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive.

(b) Commencing June 1, 1987, any substance that is defined in subdivision (a) as a toxic substance causing chronic illness shall not be purchased or ordered by a school, school district, or governing authority of a private school for use by students in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, unless it meets the labeling standards specified in Section 32065.

(c) If the State Department of Health Services finds that, because the chronically toxic, carcinogenic, or radioactive substances contained in an art or craft product cannot be ingested, inhaled, or otherwise absorbed into the body during any reasonably foreseeable use of the product in a way that could pose a potential health risk, the department may exempt the product from these requirements to the extent it determines to be consistent with adequate protection of the public health and safety.

(d) For the purposes of this article, an art or craft material shall be presumed to contain an ingredient that is a toxic substance causing chronic illness if the ingredient, whether an intentional ingredient or an impurity, is 1 percent or more by weight of the mixture or product, or if the State Department of Health Services determines that the toxic or carcinogenic properties of the art or craft material are such that labeling is necessary for the adequate protection of the public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 31.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32065.

Warning labels for substances specified in Section 32064 shall meet all of the following standards:

(a) The warning label shall be affixed in a conspicuous place and shall contain the signal word “WARNING,” to alert users of potential adverse health effects.

(b) The warning label shall contain information on the health-related dangers of the art or craft material.

(1) If the product contains a human carcinogen, the warning shall contain the statement: “CANCER HAZARD! Overexposure may create cancer risk.”

(2) If the product contains a potential human carcinogen, and does not contain a human carcinogen, the warning shall contain the statement: “POSSIBLE CANCER HAZARD! Overexposure might create cancer risk.”

(3) If the product contains a toxic substance causing chronic illness, the warning shall contain, but not be limited to, the following statement or statements where applicable:

(A) May cause sterility or damage to reproductive organs.

(B) May cause birth defects or harm to developing fetus.

(C) May be excreted in human milk causing harm to a nursing infant.

(D) May cause central nervous system depression or injury.

(E) May cause numbness or weakness in the extremities.

(F) Overexposure may cause damage to (specify organ).

(G) Heating above (specify degrees) may cause hazardous decomposition products.

(4) If a product contains more than one chronically toxic substance, or if a single substance can cause more than one chronic health effect, the required statements may be combined into one warning statement.

(c) The warning label shall contain a list of ingredients that are toxic substances causing chronic illness.

(d) The warning label shall contain a statement or statements of safe use and storage instructions, conforming to the following list. The label shall contain, but not be limited to, as many of the following risk statements as are applicable:

(1) Keep out of reach of children.

(2) When using, do not eat, drink, or smoke.

(3) Wash hands after use and before eating, drinking, or smoking.

(4) Keep container tightly closed.

(5) Store in well ventilated area.

(6) Avoid contact with skin.

(7) Wear protective clothing (specify type).

(8) Wear NIOSH certified masks for dust, mists, or fumes.

(9) Wear NIOSH certified respirator with appropriate cartridge for (specify type).

(10) Wear NIOSH certified supplied air respirator.

(11) Use window exhaust fan to remove vapors and assure adequate ventilation (specify explosion proof if necessary).

(12) Use local exhaust hood (specify type).

(13) Do not heat above (specify degrees) without adequate ventilation.

(14) Do not use/mix with (specify material).

(e) The warning label shall contain a statement on where to obtain more information, such as, “Call your local poison control center for more health information.”

(f) The warning label, or any other label on the substance, shall contain the name and address of the manufacturer or repackager.

(g) If all of the above information cannot fit on the package label, a package insert shall be required to convey all the necessary information to the consumer. In this event, the label shall contain a statement to refer to the package insert, such as “CAUTION: See package insert before use.” For purposes of this section, “package insert” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon a leaflet or suitable material accompanying the art supply. The language on this insert shall be nontechnical and nonpromotional in tone and content.

The requirements set forth in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, shall not be considered to be complied with unless the required words, statements, or other information appear on the outside container or wrapper, or on a package insert that is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper and is painted in a color in contrast with the product or the package containing the product.

An art or craft material shall be considered to be in compliance with this section if Article 6 (commencing with Section 108500) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code requires labeling of the art or craft material, and if the material is in compliance with that article.

The manufacturer of any art or craft material sold, distributed, offered for sale, or exposed for sale in this state shall supply upon request to the State Department of Health Services any information required by the department in order to perform its duties under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 32.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32066.

The State Department of Health Services shall, by June 1, 1987, develop a list of those art or craft materials which cannot be purchased or ordered for use in kindergarten and in grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and a list of materials which, while not currently sold or manufactured, may be reasonably suspected to still exist at some schools. In developing the lists, the State Department of Health Services shall consult with manufacturers of art supplies, artists’ groups, health organizations, and toxicologists as the State Department of Health Services deems appropriate. The Department of Health Services shall periodically update the lists as it deems appropriate.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall distribute the lists to all school districts and the governing authorities of all private schools in California, and shall make the lists available to preschools, childcare centers, and other businesses and organizations which involve children in the use of art or craft materials.

The superintendent shall inform school districts and governing authorities of all private schools of the requirements of this article, and shall encourage school districts and the governing authorities of all private schools to dispose of art or craft material which may contain human carcinogens, potential human carcinogens, or chronically toxic substances, but which is not affected by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 252, Sec. 1.   Operative June 1, 1987, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 252.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Carbon Monoxide Devices [32080. - 32081.]

32080.

For purposes of this article, “fossil fuel” has the same meaning as defined in Section 13262 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 475, Sec. 2.   (AB 56)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

32081.

(a) By July 1, 2015, the State Fire Marshal shall propose for adoption by the California Building Standards Commission, for the commission’s next triennial code adoption cycle, appropriate standards for the installation of carbon monoxide devices in school buildings. The proposed building standards shall require carbon monoxide devices to be installed in public and private school buildings that meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The school
 building is constructed pursuant to the 2016 California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), or any amendments to the California Building Standards Code which follow.
